Georgia, session 2025_26, HB919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 6A of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to outdoor
stewardship, is amended by revising Code Section 12-6A-5, relating to establishment of the
Georgia Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund, as follows:
"12-6A-5.
(a) There is established the Georgia Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund as a separate fund
in the state treasury. Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, the
The General Assembly shall appropriate to the trust fund 40 percent of all moneys received
by the state from the sales and use tax collected by establishments classified under the 2007
North American Industry Classification Code 451110, sporting goods stores, in the most
recently completed fiscal year.
H. B. 919
- 1 -

LC 44 9005
(b) Such funds shall not lapse to the general fund. Such funds shall be used to support the
protection and conservation of land and shall be used to supplement, not supplant,
department resources.
(c)(1) In the event that, in any current fiscal year, the most recently completed fiscal
year's total moneys received from the levy of a sales and use tax fall at least 1 percent
below the total moneys received from the levy of the tax in the year prior to the most
recently completed fiscal year, then the amount that the General Assembly shall
appropriate to the trust fund for the following fiscal year shall be reduced by 20 percent.
(2) In the event that, in a fiscal year following the fiscal year of an initial trust fund
appropriation reduction pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the most recently
completed fiscal year's total moneys received from the levy of a sales and use tax fall at
least 1 percent below the total moneys received from the levy of the tax in the year prior
to the most recently completed fiscal year, then the amount that the General Assembly
shall appropriate to the trust fund for the following fiscal year shall be reduced by 50
percent.
(d) In any current fiscal year following a year for which the amount appropriated to the
trust fund is reduced in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, the same
percentage reduction shall continue unless the total moneys received from the levy of the
sales and use tax in the most recently completed fiscal year equal or exceed the total
moneys received from the levy of the sales and use tax in the most recent fiscal year in
which no reduction in the amount appropriated to the trust fund occurred pursuant to
subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 919
- 2 -